Missouri, session 2026, SB1444.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 407.3007, to read as
follows:
407.3007. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" or "AI" means:
(a) Any artificial system that performs tasks under
varying and unpredictable circumstances without significant
human oversight or that can learn from experience and
improve performance when exposed to data sets;
(b) An artificial system developed in computer
software, physical hardware, or other computer systems that
solves tasks requiring human-like perception, cognition,
planning, learning, communication, or physical action;
(c) An artificial system designed to think or act like
a human, including cognitive architectures and neural
networks;
(d) A set of techniques, including machine learning,
that is designed to approximate a cognitive task; or
(e) An artificial system designed to act rationally,
including an intelligent software agent or embodied robot
that achieves goals using perception, planning, reasoning,
learning, communicating, decision making, and acting;
1

(2) "Mental health professional", the same as defined
in section 632.005 and any profession licensed under chapter
337.
2. Any person or entity who develops or deploys
artificial intelligence in the state shall not advertise or
represent to the public that the AI is or is able to act as
a mental health professional or is capable of providing
therapy services, psychotherapy services, or a mental health
diagnosis.
3. Any violation of this section shall be considered
an unlawful practice under the Missouri merchandising
practices act under this chapter.
4. The attorney general shall enforce the provisions
of this section. Any individual may report violations of
this section to the attorney general. If the attorney
general finds that a violation occurred, the attorney
general shall commence a civil action in a court of
competent jurisdiction. If the court finds that a violation
occurred, the court may grant damages, civil penalties,
injunctive relief, attorney fees, and any such other relief
the court finds appropriate. Notwithstanding the provisions
of section 407.100 to the contrary, civil penalties shall be
as follows:
(1) Ten thousand dollars for the first violation; or
(2) Twenty thousand dollars for any subsequent
violation.
2